Utah statutes.
31A-15-202.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Completed operations liability" means liability, including liability for
activities which are completed or abandoned before the date of the occurrence
giving rise to the liability, arising out of the installation, maintenance, or
repair of any product at a site which is not owned or controlled by:
(a)  any person who performs that work; or
(b)  any person who hires an independent contractor to perform that work.
(2)  "Domicile," for purposes of determining the state in which a purchasing
group is domiciled, means:
(a)  for a corporation, the state in which the purchasing group is
incorporated; and
(b)  for an unincorporated entity, the state of its principal place of
business.
(3)  "Hazardous financial condition" means that a risk retention group, based
on its present or reasonably anticipated financial condition, although not yet
financially impaired or insolvent, is unlikely to be able:
(a)  to meet obligations to policyholders with respect to known claims and
reasonably anticipated claims; or
(b)  to pay other obligations in the normal course of business.
(4)  "Insurance" means primary insurance, excess insurance, reinsurance,
surplus lines insurance, and any other arrangement for shifting and
distributing risk which is determined to be insurance under the laws of this
state.
(5) (a)  "Liability" means legal liability for damages, including costs of
defense, legal costs and fees, and other claims expenses because of injuries
to other persons, damage to their property, or other damage or loss to other
persons, resulting from or arising out of:
(i)  any profit or nonprofit business, trade, product, professional or other
services, premises, or operations; or
(ii)  any activity of any state or local government or any agency or political
subdivision of any state or local government.
(b)  "Liability" does not include personal risk liability and an employer's
liability with respect to its employees other than legal liability under the
federal Employers' Liability Act.
(6)  "NAIC" means the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.
(7)  "Personal risk liability" means liability for damages because of injury
to any person, damage to property, or other loss or damage resulting from any
personal, familial, or household responsibilities or activities rather than
from responsibilities or activities referred to in Subsection (5).
(8)  "Plan of operation or a feasibility study" means an analysis which
presents the expected activities and results of a risk retention group,
including:
(a)  information sufficient to verify that its members are engaged in
businesses or activities similar or related with respect to the liability to
which members are exposed by virtue of any related, similar or common
business, trade, product, services, premises or operations;
(b)  for each state in which it intends to operate, the coverages,
deductibles, coverage limits, rates, and rating classification systems for
each line of insurance the group intends to offer;
(c)  historical and expected loss experience of the proposed members and
national experience of similar exposures to the extent that this experience is
reasonably available;
(d)  pro forma financial statements and projections;
(e)  appropriate opinions by a qualified, independent casualty actuary,
including a determination of minimum premium or participation levels required
to commence operations and to prevent a hazardous financial condition;
(f)  identification of management, underwriting and claims procedures,
marketing methods, managerial oversight methods, investment policies, and
reinsurance agreements;
(g)  identification of each state in which the risk retention group has
obtained, or sought to obtain, a charter and license, and a description of its
status in each such state; and
(h)  any other matters required by the commissioner of the state in which the
risk retention group is chartered for liability insurance companies authorized
by the insurance laws of that state.
(9) (a)  "Product liability" means liability for damages because of any
personal injury, death, emotional harm, consequential economic damage, or
property damage, including damages resulting from the loss of use of property,
if the liability arises out of the manufacture, design, importation,
distribution, packaging, labeling, lease, or sale of a product.
(b)  "Product liability" does not include the liability of any person for
those damages described in Subsection (9)(a) if the product involved was in
the possession of the person when the incident giving rise to the claim
occurred.
(10)  "Purchasing group" means any group which:
(a)  has as one of its purposes the purchase of liability insurance on a group
basis;
(b)  purchases liability insurance only for its group members and only to
cover their similar or related liability exposure, as described in Subsection
(10)(c);
(c)  is composed of members whose businesses or activities are similar or
related with respect to the liability to which members are exposed by virtue
of any related, similar, or common business, trade, products, services,
premises, or operations; and
(d)  is domiciled in any state.
(11)  "Risk retention group" means any corporation or other limited liability
association:
(a)  whose primary activity consists of assuming and spreading all, or any
portion of, the liability exposure of its group members;
(b)  which is organized for the primary purpose of conducting the activity
described under Subsection (11)(a);
(c)  which:
(i)  is chartered and licensed as a liability insurance company and authorized
to engage in the business of insurance under the laws of any state; or
(ii) (A)  before January 1, 1985, was chartered or licensed and authorized to
engage in the business of insurance under the laws of Bermuda or the Cayman
Islands and, before January 1, 1985, had certified to the insurance
commissioner of at least one state that it satisfied the capitalization
requirements of that state;
(B)  however, any such group as described in Subsection (11)(c)(ii)(A) shall
be considered to be a risk retention group only if it has been engaged in
business continuously since January 1, 1985, and only for the purpose of
continuing to provide insurance to cover product liability or completed
operations liability, as these terms were defined in the Product Liability
Risk Retention Act of 1981 before the date of the enactment of the Liability
Risk Retention Act of 1986;
(d)  which does not exclude any person from membership in the group solely to
provide for members of the group a competitive advantage over the excluded
person;
(e)  which:
(i)  has as its owners only persons who comprise the membership of the risk
retention group and who are provided insurance by the group; or
(ii)  has as its sole owner an organization which:
(A)  has as its members only persons who comprise the membership of the risk
retention group; and
(B)  has as its owners only persons who comprise the membership of the risk
retention group and who are provided insurance by the group;
(f)  whose members are engaged in businesses or activities similar or related
with respect to the liability to which the members are exposed by virtue of
any related, similar, or common business trade, products, services, premises
or operations;
(g)  whose activities do not include providing insurance other than:
(i)  liability insurance for assuming and spreading all or any portion of the
liability of its group members; and
(ii)  reinsurance with respect to the liability of any other risk retention
group, or any members of the other group, which is engaged in businesses or
activities so that the group or member meets the requirement described in
Subsection (11)(f) for membership in the risk retention group which provides
the reinsurance; and
(h)  the name of which includes the phrase "risk retention group."
